Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1651
Jurors; actions to which county or other municipal corporation a party; inhabitants and taxpayers; serve, when.

On the trial of any suit in which a county or any other municipal corporation is a party, the inhabitants and taxpayers of such county or municipal corporation shall be qualified to serve as jurors if otherwise qualified according to law.

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 16;

R.S.1913, § 8136;

C.S.1922, § 9072;

C.S.1929, § 20-1602;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1602;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 8.

Interest as taxpayer may disqualify where he testifies such interest would influence verdict. Omaha v. Cane, 15 Neb. 657, 20 N.W. 101 (1884).

Ordinarily interest as taxpayer does not disqualify. Omaha v. Olmstead, 5 Neb. 446 (1877).